District of Columbia statutes.
16-831.10

Effect of a third-party custody order.

An order awarding physical or legal custody of a child to a third party shall not terminate the parent and child relationship, including:

(1)

The right of the child to inherit from his or her parent;

(2)

The parent’s right to visit or contact the child, except as limited by court order;

(3)

The parent’s right to consent to the child’s adoption;

(4)

The parent’s right to determine the child’s religious affiliation; and

(5)

The parent’s responsibility to provide financial, medical, and other support for the child.

Sept. 20, 2007, D.C. Law 17-21, § 2(b), 54 DCR 6835
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 217(k), 56 DCR 1117
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the section designation.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Safe and Stable Homes for Children and Youth Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-69, July 9, 2007, 54 DCR 6826).